District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0401.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
Act may be cited as the "Youth Records Transparency and Oversight Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 23 of Title 16 of the D.C. Official Code as follows:
(a) Section 2331(c)(4) is amended by adding new subsubsections (H-J) to read as
follows:
“(H) In delinquency or need of supervision cases, the Chair of the Council Committee
with oversight over the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services and their designee(s) when
necessary for the discharge of their official duties;
“(I) In neglect cases, the Chair of the Committee with oversight over the Child and
Family Services Agency and their designee(s) when necessary for the discharge of their official
duties; and
“(J) The Office of the Ombudsperson for Children when necessary for the discharge of its
official duties.”.


(b) Section 2332(c)(4) is amended by adding new subsubsections (F-H) to read as
follows:
“(F) In delinquency or need of supervision cases, the Chair of the Council Committee
with oversight over the Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services and their designee(s) when
necessary for the discharge of their official duties;
“(G) In neglect cases, the Chair of the Committee with oversight over the Child and
Family Services Agency and their designee(s) when necessary for the discharge of their official
duties; and
“(H) The Office of the Ombudsperson for Children when necessary for the discharge of
its official duties.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.